Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-716
Motor fuel distribution, sale, or delivery; license; when required; records.

(1) Any person owning or possessing motor fuel in this state, including motor fuel stored at a pipeline terminal or barge terminal, for distribution, sale, or delivery in this state shall obtain a license from the department unless such person is already licensed under other sections of the motor fuel laws and is reporting all transactions involving any motor fuel.

(2) Every person licensed under subsection (1) of this section shall keep a complete and accurate record of all motor vehicle fuel, to be based on gross gallons, (a) received, purchased, or obtained, which record shall show the name and address of the person from whom each transfer or purchase of motor vehicle fuel was made, the point from which shipped or delivered, the point at which received, the method of delivery, and the quantity of each transfer or purchase, and (b) delivered or sold, which record shall show the name of the person to whom each transfer or sale of motor vehicle fuel was made, the point from which shipped or delivered, the point at which received, the method of delivery, and the quantity of each transfer or sale.

(3) Every person licensed under subsection (1) of this section shall keep a complete and accurate record of all diesel fuel to include the same information required in subsection (2) of this section and the sales of exempt diesel fuel showing the identity of the purchaser and the quantity sold. The sales of exempt diesel fuel shall include the total exempt sales during the month to each retailer accepting exemption certificates from his or her customers.

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 110;

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 98.